Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE E. GOVERNMENT PROPERTY

CHAPTER 2204. ACQUISITION OF LAND FOR STATE AND FEDERAL PURPOSES

SUBCHAPTER A. ACQUISITION OF LAND BY STATE

Sec. 2204.001. ACQUISITION OF LAND BY STATE. (a) The governor may purchase land or the right to use land that is required by this state for any type of public use.

(b) If the governor fails to agree with the owner of the land on the price for the land or the use of the land, the land may be condemned for public use in the name of this state. On the direction of the governor, condemnation proceedings shall be instituted against the owner of the land by the attorney general or the district or county attorney acting under the direction of the attorney general.

(c) If the governor determines that the amount of damages awarded in the condemnation proceedings under Subsection (b) is excessive, the state may not pay the damages. In that event, the state shall pay the costs of the proceedings and may not take further action.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.002. RESTRICTION ON ACQUISITION OF REAL PROPERTY. A state agency, as defined by Section 658.001, may not accept a gift or devise of real property or spend appropriated money to purchase real property without statutory authority or other legislative authorization.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1499, Sec. 1.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2204.003. GIFTS OF REAL PROPERTY TO INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. An institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, may accept a gift or devise of real property from a private entity to establish scholarships or professorships or to be held in trust for other educational purposes only if done consistently with rules and regulations adopted by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board pursuant to its power to adopt such rules and regulations under Chapter 61, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1499, Sec. 1.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. GENERAL PROVISIONS FOR ACQUISITION OF LAND AND JURISDICTION OVER LAND BY UNITED STATES

Sec. 2204.101. CONSENT TO UNITED STATES TO ACQUIRE LAND. (a) The legislature consents to the purchase or acquisition by the United States, including acquisition by condemnation, of land in this state made in accordance with this subchapter.

(b) The United States may purchase, acquire, hold, own, occupy, and possess land in this state that it considers expedient and that it seeks to occupy as a site:

(1) on which to erect and maintain a lighthouse, fort, military station, magazine, arsenal, dockyard, customhouse, post office, or other necessary public building; or

(2) for erecting a lock or dam, straightening a stream by making a cutoff, building a levee, or erecting any other structure or improvement that may become necessary for developing or improving a waterway, river, or harbor of this state.

(c) During condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of land by the United States under this section, the United States may occupy the land and construct improvements on the land immediately on the filing of the award of the condemnation commissioners with the condemnation court, without awaiting the decision of the court, if the United States deposits an amount equal to the amount of the award of the commissioners plus the amount of all costs adjudged against the United States.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.102. SALE OF STATE LAND TO UNITED STATES. (a) The governor may sell to the United States land owned by this state that the United States desires to acquire for a purpose specified by Section 2204.101.

(b) On payment of the purchase money for the land into the state treasury, the land commissioner, on the order of the governor, shall issue a patent for that land to the United States in the same manner that other patents are issued.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.103. CESSION OF JURISDICTION TO UNITED STATES. (a) On written application of the United States to the governor, the governor, in the name and on behalf of this state, may cede to the United States exclusive jurisdiction, subject to Subsection (c), over land acquired by the United States under this subchapter over which the United States desires to acquire constitutional jurisdiction for a purpose provided by Section 2204.101.

(b) An application for cession must be:

(1) accompanied by proper evidence of the acquisition of the land;

(2) authenticated and recorded; and

(3) include or have attached an accurate description by metes and bounds of the land for which cession is sought.

(c) A cession of jurisdiction may not be made under this section except on the express condition, which must be included in the instrument of cession, that this state retains concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over every portion of the land ceded so that all civil or criminal process issued under the authority of this state or a court or judicial officer of this state may be executed by the proper officers of this state on any person amenable to service of process within the limits of the land to be ceded, in the same manner and to the same effect as if the cession had not occurred.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER C. CONVEYANCE OF STATE HIGHWAY LAND TO UNITED STATES FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES

Sec. 2204.201. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to land or an interest in land owned by this state that is under the control of the Texas Department of Transportation.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.202. CONVEYANCE TO UNITED STATES FOR MILITARY PURPOSES. The governor, on the recommendation of the Texas Transportation Commission or on the request of the United States supported by the recommendation of the Texas Transportation Commission, may convey to the United States an easement or other interest in land that:

(1) is located near a federally owned or operated military installation or facility; and

(2) may be necessary for the construction, operation, and maintenance of the military installation or facility.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.203. CONVEYANCE TO UNITED STATES FOR CIVIL WORKS PROJECT. (a) In this section, "civil works project" means a flood control project, river and harbor improvement project, water conservation project, or other civil works project constructed or to be constructed by the United States.

(b) The governor, on the recommendation of the Texas Transportation Commission or on the request of the United States supported by the recommendation of the Texas Transportation Commission, may convey to the United States or any governmental subdivision or agency of this state that is cooperating with the United States in a civil works project an easement or other interest in land that may be necessary for the construction, operation, and maintenance of the civil works project.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.204. CONSIDERATION FOR CONVEYANCE. A conveyance under this subchapter may be made without monetary consideration or for a consideration determined by the Texas Transportation Commission.

Renumbered from Sec. 2204.202 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.205. FEE SIMPLE NOT OWNED BY STATE. For land for which the fee simple title is not vested in this state and for which the owner of the fee executes an easement to the United States for the purposes provided by Section 2204.202 or 2204.203, the governor on the recommendation of the Texas Transportation Commission may join in and assent to the easement by the same or a separate instrument.

Renumbered from Sec. 2204.203 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER D. STATE GRANTS TO UNITED STATES FOR FLOOD CONTROL IN BED AND BANKS OF PECOS AND DEVILS RIVERS AND RIO GRANDE

Sec. 2204.301. GRANT TO UNITED STATES. The governor may grant to the United States in accordance with this subchapter those portions of the beds and banks of the Pecos and Devils rivers in Val Verde County and of the Rio Grande in Brewster, Cameron, Hidalgo, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, Kinney, Maverick, Presidio, Starr, Terrell, Val Verde, Webb, and Zapata counties:

(1) for which title is vested in this state; and

(2) that may be necessary or expedient in the construction and use of the storage and flood control dams and their resultant reservoirs, diversion works, and appurtenances provided for in the Treaty Relating to the Utilization of the Waters of the Colorado and Tijuana Rivers, and of the Rio Grande (Rio Bravo) from Fort Quitman, Texas, to the Gulf of Mexico, concluded by the United States and the United Mexican States on February 3, 1944.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.302. APPLICATION BY UNITED STATES. On application to the governor by the United States Commissioner, International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico, describing the area necessary or expedient for the purposes described in Section 2204.301, the governor shall issue a grant for and on behalf of this state to the United States conveying to the United States the area described in the application.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.303. MINERAL RESERVATION REQUIRED. A grant under this subchapter must reserve to this state all minerals except rock, sand, and gravel needed by the United States in the operation or construction by the United States or its agents of any of the works described by Section 2204.301. The reservation must provide that:

(1) the minerals reserved to this state may not be explored for, developed, or produced in a manner that at any time will prevent or interfere with the operation or construction of those works; and

(2) before exploring for or developing reserved minerals, this state must obtain the written consent of the United States Section, International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico, or its successor agency, as to the proposed area sought to be explored or developed by this state, including the location of and production facilities for oil wells, gas wells, or oil and gas wells.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.304. REVERSION TO STATE ON NONUSE. A grant under this subchapter must contain a reservation providing that if any part of the property granted ceases to be used for the purposes set out in Section 2204.301 for a continuous period of five years, that part shall immediately and automatically revert to this state at the end of that period.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.305. PRIVATE PROPERTY RIGHTS NOT AFFECTED. This subchapter does not divest, limit, or otherwise affect the property rights, including riparian rights, under the laws of this state of the private owners of land abutting a portion of a river to which this subchapter applies.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER E. STATE GRANTS TO UNITED STATES IN BED AND BANKS OF RIO GRANDE TO IMPLEMENT BOUNDARY TREATY

Sec. 2204.401. GRANT TO UNITED STATES. The governor may grant to the United States in accordance with this subchapter those portions of, or easements on, the beds and banks of the Rio Grande in Brewster, Cameron, Hidalgo, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, Kinney, Maverick, Presidio, Starr, Terrell, Val Verde, Webb, and Zapata counties:

(1) for which title is vested in this state; and

(2) that may be necessary or expedient to facilitate the accomplishment of projects for the following purposes, as provided for in the Treaty to Resolve Pending Boundary Differences and Maintain the Rio Grande and Colorado River as the International Boundary between the United States of America and the United Mexican States, entered into force April 18, 1972, and the American-Mexican Boundary Treaty Act of 1972 (22 U.S.C. Sections 277d-34 et seq.):

(A) the relocation and rectification of the Rio Grande and construction of works for flood control in the Presidio-Ojinaga Valley;

(B) the rectification of and channel stabilization on the Rio Grande between Fort Quitman in Hudspeth County and Haciendita in Presidio County;

(C) the relocation and rectification of the Rio Grande upstream from Hidalgo-Reynosa in Hidalgo County;

(D) the preservation of the Rio Grande as the boundary by prohibiting the construction of works that may cause deflection or obstruction of the normal flow or floodflows of the Rio Grande; or

(E) other channel relocations and rectifications or boundary adjustments approved by the governments of the United States and the United Mexican States.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.402. APPLICATION BY UNITED STATES. On application to the governor by the United States Commissioner, International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico, describing the area and the interest in that area necessary or expedient for the purposes described in Section 2204.401, the governor shall issue a grant for and on behalf of this state to the United States conveying to the United States the area and interest described in the application.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.403. MINERAL RESERVATION REQUIRED. (a) A grant under this subchapter must reserve to this state all minerals except rock, sand, and gravel needed by the United States in the operation or construction by the United States or its agents of any of the works described by Section 2204.401. The reservation must provide that:

(1) the minerals reserved to this state may not be explored for, developed, or produced in a manner that will at any time prevent or interfere with the operation or construction of those works; and

(2) before exploring for or developing reserved minerals, this state must obtain the written consent of the United States Section, International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico, or its successor agency, as to the proposed area sought to be explored or developed by this state, including the location of and production facilities for oil wells, gas wells, or oil and gas wells or other minerals.

(b) In a grant to the United States of fee title to the bed and banks of the Rio Grande for the relocation and rectification of the existing channel under the treaty that is to cause a portion of the channel to be in the territorial limits of the United Mexican States after its relocation and rectification, the reservation is required only for the portion of the channel that will remain in the territorial limits of the United States on completion of the relocation and rectification project.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.404. PRIVATE PROPERTY RIGHTS NOT AFFECTED. This subchapter does not divest, limit, or otherwise affect the property rights, including riparian rights, under the laws of this state of the private owners of land abutting a portion of the Rio Grande to which this subchapter applies.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER F. CONSENT TO FEDERAL ACQUISITION OF LAND FOR FLOOD CONTROL IN TRINITY WATERSHED

Sec. 2204.501. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to land in:

(1) Denton, Jack, Montague, Parker, and Wise counties; and

(2) that portion of the Trinity Watershed located in Collin, Cooke, Dallas, Fannin, Grayson, Hunt, Kaufman, Rockwall, Tarrant, or Van Zandt County.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.502. CONSENT OF STATE. (a) This state consents to the acquisition by the United States by purchase, gift, or condemnation with adequate compensation of land or any right or interest in land in this state that the United States determines is needed for programs and works of improvement for runoff and water-flow retardation, soil erosion prevention, or other flood-control purposes in this state.

(b) This state does not consent to the acquisition of land under this subchapter by condemnation unless the apparent owner of the land consents to the acquisition.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.503. CERTAIN RESERVATIONS PERMITTED. The United States may acquire land under this subchapter subject to reservations of rights-of-way, timber, minerals, or easements.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.504. PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES. The United States must remit an amount equal to one percent of the purchase price of acquired land each year in lieu of taxes to the counties and school districts in which the land is located.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2204.505. CONCURRENT JURISDICTION RETAINED FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES. This state retains concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over acquired land so that civil process in all cases and criminal process issued under the authority of this state against a person charged with the commission of a crime in or outside of the territory of the land may be executed on that land in the same manner as if this subchapter did not exist.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER G. CONVEYANCE OF EASEMENT TO UNITED STATES FOR LOUISIANA AND TEXAS INTRACOASTAL WATERWAY

Sec. 2204.601. CONVEYANCE TO UNITED STATES. (a) The state conveys to the United States an easement to construct and maintain the Louisiana and Texas Intracoastal Waterway over and through the following described areas:

(1) the disconnected portions of the stream beds of Mud Bayou and East Bay Bayou from approximately Station 1519 to approximately Station 1914 as shown on United States Engineer Department map, "Louisiana and Texas Intra-Coastal Waterway, Sabine River-Galveston Bay Section, Survey of 1926-7, Sheet No. 12, File 16-2-16," the portions of the stream beds of Mud Bayou and East Bay Bayou covered by this easement being 300 feet wide and located in Chambers and Galveston counties where the intracoastal waterway intersects the meanderings of the bayous; and

(2) the disconnected portions of bays and any tidal lands owned by the state within an area 300 feet in width extending from the Galveston-Brazoria County line to the nine-foot contour in Aransas Bay along the route of the projected Louisiana and Texas Intracoastal Waterway as shown in red on the map, in four sheets, prepared by the United States Engineer Office, Galveston, Texas, entitled "Louisiana and Texas Intracoastal Waterway, Survey of 1927-1928," Index Sheets Nos. 1, 2, 3, and 4, File No. 16-4-4, the portions of bays and tidal lands being located in Brazoria, Matagorda, Calhoun, and Aransas counties.

(b) The state conveys to the United States an easement to deposit dredged material during the construction and maintenance of the Louisiana and Texas Intracoastal Waterway in bays and on tidal lands owned by the state within 2,000 feet of the area described by Subsection (a)(2).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.602. REVERSION TO STATE ON FAILURE TO MAINTAIN. If the United States fails at any time to maintain or have maintained the Louisiana and Texas Intracoastal Waterway, the easement granted under Section 2204.601 terminates and reverts to the state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.603. PROPERTY RIGHTS NOT AFFECTED. This subchapter does not affect or impair:

(1) a person's vested right; or

(2) the right of a person to use and maintain a bridge in existence on May 17, 1929, on or across Mud Bayou or East Bay Bayou.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER H. CONVEYANCE TO UNITED STATES OF AREA IN NUECES COUNTY NAVIGATION DISTRICT FOR MILITARY PURPOSES

Sec. 2204.701. GRANT OF EASEMENT TO UNITED STATES. The state conveys to the United States an easement in an area three square miles or larger, or of different form, in the Nueces County Navigation District, in Nueces Bay, Nueces County, Texas, as designated by the United States, to erect and maintain a fort, military station or camp, magazine, arsenal, dockyard, barracks, lighthouse, naval yard, naval base, naval air base, naval air station, channel, approach for battleships, or any other necessary military purpose.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.702. CONVEYANCE OF LAND TO UNITED STATES. On demand from the United States, the governor shall convey to the United States the area described by Section 2204.701 for a purpose described by Section 2204.701.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.703. LIMITATION ON CONVEYANCE. A conveyance under this subchapter is subject to the limitations described by Sections 2204.101-2204.103, Government Code, and Sections 61.115-61.117, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.704. MINERAL RESERVATION REQUIRED. A grant of an easement under this subchapter must reserve to the state all minerals, including oil and gas.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2204.705. REVERSION TO STATE ON NONUSE. If the United States no longer uses the area described by Section 2204.701 for a purpose described by Section 2204.701 or fails to maintain or to have maintained at any time the facilities described by Section 2204.701, the easement granted under this subchapter terminates and reverts to the state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 9.010(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.